Illinois, session 104th, SB2782.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Public Health Powers and 5Duties Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is 6amended by adding Section 2310-750 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2310/2310-750 new)8    Sec. 2310-750. Sudden unexpected death in epilepsy. 9    (a) As used in this Section, "sudden unexpected death in 10epilepsy" means sudden, unexpected death in a patient with 11epilepsy, with or without evidence of a seizure.12    (b) The Department shall undertake a public education 13campaign to bring broad public awareness to communities across 14this State of the risk of sudden unexpected death in epilepsy 15that is focused on providing the public with: 16        (1) current and evidence-based information about 17    sudden unexpected death in epilepsy risk factors and 18    conditions reviewed and approved by one or more 19    professional not-for-profit organizations with expertise 20    in neurology and epilepsy; and21        (2) contact information for nonprofit organizations 22    that provide information and support services for epilepsy 23    conditions.  SB2782 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 15930 AAS 29409 b1    (c) The Department shall post the information listed in 2subsection (a) on the Department's website, with the following 3requirements:4        (1) the Department shall ensure that the information 5    under this Section is culturally and linguistically 6    appropriate for all recipients;7        (2) any local or national organization that provides 8    education or services related to epilepsy conditions may 9    request that the Department include on its website that 10    organization's informational material and contact 11    information; if the Department determines that the 12    organization's informational material, contact 13    information, or both are necessary or appropriate under 14    this Section, the Department may include the 15    organization's informational material, contact 16    information, or both on its website, in written 17    information provided under this subsection (c), or both; 18    and19        (3) the Department shall, in consultation with local 20    and national organizations that provide education or 21    services related to epilepsy conditions, provide guidance 22    to health care practitioners in determining whether a 23    patient is at elevated risk for sudden unexpected death in 24    epilepsy, including, but not limited to, whether the 25    patient has had convulsive seizures, the frequency and 26    recency of such seizures, and whether the patient's   SB2782 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 15930 AAS 29409 b1    symptoms have subsided in response to medicinal or 2    surgical treatment.3    (d) The Department shall adopt rules implementing this 4Section.